Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 6. Cause-Related Marketing

§ 2481a.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Charitable sales promotion” means an advertising or sales campaign conducted in this State by a commercial coventurer in which it is represented to the public that an amount per unit of goods or services purchased or used by the public or an amount based on aggregate purchases or use by the public will benefit a charitable organization or charitable purpose. “Charitable sales promotion” does not include:

a promotion in which 100 percent of the amount paid for the goods or services will benefit a charitable organization or charitable purpose;

a promotion in which a commercial coventurer does not generate a net profit; or

a promotion that does not involve the sale or lease of goods or services.

“Commercial coventurer” means a person who for profit is regularly and primarily engaged in trade or commerce in this State other than in connection with the raising of funds for charitable purposes and who represents to the public that an amount per unit of goods or services purchased or used by the public or an amount based on aggregate purchases or use by the public will benefit a charitable organization or charitable purpose.

“Representation” means an advertisement, commercial, or other communication to the public in any medium.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 18, 2012.

§ 2481b.
Required disclosures.

Every commercial coventurer shall disclose the following information in a clear and conspicuous manner in close proximity to any representation, in connection with a charitable sales promotion, that an amount per unit of goods or services purchased or used by the public, or an amount based on aggregate purchases or use by the public, will benefit a charitable organization or charitable purpose:

the name of the charitable organization or purpose that is to benefit from the charitable sales promotion;

the amount per unit of goods or services purchased or used that will benefit the charitable organization or purpose or, if not known, the estimated amount, in either case expressed as a dollar amount or a percentage of the amount paid for the purchase or use, except that if the amount is based on aggregate purchases or use, that amount and how it will be calculated shall be disclosed; and

any maximum amount that will benefit the charitable organization or purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 18, 2012.

§ 2481c.
Record-keeping.

A commercial coventurer shall maintain records that are sufficient to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of this chapter and the disclosed terms of a charitable sales promotion.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 18, 2012.

§ 2481d.
Violations.

A violation of this subchapter is deemed to be a violation of section 2453 of this title. This section shall not be construed to limit a commercial coventurer’s liability under any other law.

The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct civil investigations, and bring civil actions with respect to the acts and practices of a commercial coventurer as is provided under subchapter 1 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 18, 2012.